Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-4202
Audiovisual court appearance; when permitted.

(1) Except for trials, when the appearance of a detainee or prisoner is required in any court at a nonevidentiary criminal proceeding, the detainee or prisoner may make an audiovisual court appearance. However, a judge or magistrate is not required to allow an audiovisual court appearance and may order the detainee or prisoner to appear physically in the courtroom.

(2) An audiovisual court appearance shall meet the conditions required by sections 29-4201 to 29-4207.

Laws 1999, LB 623, § 2;

Laws 2006, LB 1115, § 21.